North Carolina, session 2025, HB1015.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. SPEAKER'S RECOMMENDATIONS
SECTION 1.1. Reid A. Williams of Johnston County is appointed to the Johnston
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2026.
SECTION 1.2. Gerald G. McKinney of Swain County is appointed to the
Southwestern Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 1.3. Dr. William Howerton of Granville County is appointed to the
Vance-Granville Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.4. Vickie L. Barnes is appointed to Wilson Community College Board
of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.5. Effective January 1, 2026, Lesa M. Wingate of Mecklenburg County
and Don A. Beal of Catawba County are appointed to the North Carolina Board of Barber and
Electrolysis Examiners for terms expiring December 31, 2028.
SECTION 1.6. Chris A. Lumsden of Surry County is appointed to the State Board
of Community Colleges for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.7. Ronald P. Gibson of Wake County and Charles S. Heilig of Gaston
County are appointed to the Centennial Authority for terms expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.8. A. Jeffrey Gragg of Caldwell County is appointed to the North
Carolina Agricultural Finance Authority for a term expiring July 1, 2028.
SECTION 1.9. Mark E. Roberts of Nash County is appointed to the North Carolina
Investment Authority for a term expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 1.10. Benton L. Toups of New Hanover County and Karen D. Rosser of
Wake County are appointed to the State Human Resources for terms expiring June 30, 2029.
PART II. PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE'S RECOMMENDATIONS
SECTION 2.1. Effective immediately, Joseph R. Budd of Forsyth County is
appointed to the North Carolina Wildlife Resources Commission for a term expiring June 30,
2027.
SECTION 2.2. Effective immediately, William Ellis Boyle of Wake County is
appointed to the State Property Tax Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2027, to fill the
unexpired term of William Peaslee.
SECTION 2.3. Effective October 1, 2025, the Honorable Deanna Ballard of
Watauga County and Benjamin P. Teague of Henderson County are appointed to NCInnovation
for terms expiring September 30, 2030.
*H1015-v-4*

SECTION 2.4. Effective January 1, 2026, Tembila Covington of Forsyth County is
appointed to the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., Board of Directors for a term
expiring December 31, 2027.
SECTION 2.5. Effective October 1, 2025, Timothy McKain of Guilford County is
appointed to the African-American Heritage Commission for a term expiring September 30,
2028.
SECTION 2.6. Effective immediately, Julie T. Williams of Wilson County is
appointed to the Wilson Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.7. Effective immediately, C. Chase Keller of Caldwell County is
appointed to the Caldwell Community College and Technical Institute Board of Trustees for a
term expiring June 30, 2026, to fill the unexpired term of James Sponenberg, III.
SECTION 2.8. Effective immediately, Dr. David T. Tayloe of Wayne County is
appointed to the Wayne Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.9. Effective September 1, 2025, Alexandra B. Hoskins of Forsyth
County is appointed to the North Carolina Professional Educator Preparation and Standards
Commission for a term expiring August 31, 2027.
PART III. CORRECTIONS
SECTION 3.1. Section 1.13 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 1.13. Jennifer Levy of Montgomery County, Maryland, Fredrick L. Nelson
Fredrick Reese of Henderson County, and Dr. Anthony Negbenebor of Cleveland County are
appointed to the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics Board of Trustees for terms
expiring June 30, 2029."
SECTION 3.2. Section 2.36 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2.36. Henry N. Stilley Henry Stilley, Jr., of Craven County is appointed to the
Craven Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029."
SECTION 3.3. Section 2.43 of S.L. 2025-29 is repealed.
SECTION 3.4. Section 2.44(a) S.L. 2025-29 is repealed.
SECTION 3.5. Section 2.48 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2.48. Tommy G. Williams of Johnston Franklin County is appointed to the
Johnston Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029."
SECTION 3.6. Section 2.58(a) of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2.58.(a) Daniel L. Taylor, Jr., of Pitt Greene County is appointed to the Pitt
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2026."
SECTION 3.7. Sections 2.73 and 2.78 of S.L. 2025-29 are repealed.
SECTION 3.8. Section 2.83 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2.83. Dennis Reno of Cleveland Mecklenburg County is appointed to the North
Carolina Boxing and Combat Sports Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2028."
SECTION 3.9. Section 2.87 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2.87. Dr. Shelley Shelly Shope of Cleveland County and Bruce Friend of Wake
County are appointed to the North Carolina Charter Schools Review Board for terms expiring
June 30, 2029."
SECTION 3.10. Section 2.92 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2.92. Chet A. Effler of McDowell County, David L. Rose of Stokes County,
Brian Gates of Surry County, and Sean L. Shawn Owens of Davidson County are appointed to
the Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission for terms expiring June 30,
2027."
SECTION 3.11. Section 2.100 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2.100. Tom Smith of Wake County, Jason Triplett of Ashe Watauga County,
Paul S. Jaber of Nash County, and Lynn Pinter of Haywood County are appointed to the North
Carolina Housing Finance Agency for terms expiring June 30, 2027."
Page 2 Session Law 2025-86 House Bill 1015

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4.1. This act is effective when it becomes law. Unless otherwise provided,
terms begin upon the effective date of this act.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 30th day of July, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
House Bill 1015 Session Law 2025-86 Page 3